Oklahoma, session 2025, HB1758.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 3-146 of Title 70, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. A statewide virtual charter school that reaches a district
composite academic achievement score within ten (10) points of the
state average composite academic achievement score, as published in
the Oklahoma State Report Card, shall receive One Hundred Thousand
Dollars ($100,000.00) to be used for lease payments, rental
facilities for student testing, transportation, or student services.

Req. No. 10698 Page 1

B. The funds described in subsection A of this section shall be
in addition to other funds the district may receive or is eligible
to receive.
C. The composite academic achievement score calculated two
years prior shall be used to determine the current fiscal year's
recipients of the funds described in subsection A of this section.
For example, the composite academic achievement scores for the 2022-
2023 school year shall determine which districts are eligible to
receive the funds for the 2025 fiscal year.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2025.
SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.

60-1-10698 SW 01/07/25








Req. No. 10698 Page 2